Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Municipal Aid Funds

54-4-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Municipal street aid fund” means the funds provided for municipalities by §§ 67-3-901 and 67-3-905;

“Municipality” means any incorporated city or incorporated town charged with the duty of constructing and maintaining streets within its corporate boundaries;

“Street” includes streets, highways, avenues, boulevards, publicly owned rights-of-way, bridges, tunnels, public parking areas or other public ways dedicated to public use and maintained for general public travel lying within a municipality's corporate boundaries; and

“Street improvements” means construction, reconstruction, improvement and maintenance of streets, including paving, repaving, grading and drainage, repairs, cleaning, acquisition and maintenance of rights-of-way, extension and widening of existing streets, elimination of railroad grade crossings, acquisition or lease or lease/purchase of trucks or other equipment necessary in the construction and maintenance of streets, including the purchase, construction or leasing of facilities to store the equipment, street lighting, signage and other traffic control devices, and administrative and other necessary expenses, including labor and employee benefits, in connection with the street improvements.

Acts 1953, ch. 1, § 1 (Williams, § 3407.20); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-406; Acts 1981, ch. 366, § 9; 1981, ch. 418, § 6; 1993, ch. 178, § 1; 2009, ch. 530, § 98.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “§§ 67-3-901 and 67-3-905” for “§§ 67-3-617 and 67-3-812” at the end of the definition of “municipal street aid fund”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 530, § 133. June 25, 2009.

Comparative Legislation. State funds for local aid:

Ala. Code § 23-1-100 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-72-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-5-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 178.150.

Miss. Code Ann. § 65-9-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 231.450 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-66.1.

Va. Code § 33.1-23.01 et seq.

Cited: Chapman v. Sullivan County, 608 S.W.2d 580, 1980 Tenn. LEXIS 511 (Tenn. 1980).

Collateral References. Highways
97.1 et seq.

54-4-202. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-4-202 (Acts 1953, ch. 1, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-407), concerning appropriations available for monthly deposit into the municipal street aid fund, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 366, § 10 and Acts 1981, ch. 418, § 7.

54-4-203. Distribution of funds — Basis — Special census.

Funds in the municipal street aid fund shall be distributed to eligible municipalities within the state monthly by the commissioner of finance and administration, or other official now or hereafter charged with the duty of allocating or distributing state funds, in proportion as the population of each municipality bears to the aggregate population of all municipalities according to the 1950 federal census or any subsequent federal census; provided, that, in the case of any area annexed to a municipality subsequent to the latest federal decennial census, the municipality may have a special census within the annexed area taken by the federal bureau of the census or in a manner directed by and satisfactory to the department of economic and community development, in which case the population of the municipality shall be revised and increased in accordance with the special census for purposes of distributing the funds, effective on the next July 1 following the certification of the census results to the commissioner of finance and administration; and provided, further, that the aggregate population of all municipalities used as a base for calculating the distribution shall be adjusted in accordance with the special census, effective on the next July 1 following the certification of the census results to the commissioner. Any eligible municipality incorporated after the last federal decennial census may likewise have a special census taken, and shall share in the distribution of the municipal street aid fund beginning on the next July 1, following certification of the census results to the commissioner. The aggregate population shall likewise be adjusted in accordance with the special census, effective on the next July 1 following the certification of the census results to the commissioner.

Any municipality shall have the right to take not more than four (4) special censuses at its own expense at any time during the interim between the regular decennial federal census. The right shall include the current decennium. The census shall be taken by the federal bureau of the census, or in a manner directed by and satisfactory to the department of economic and community development. The population of the municipality shall be revised in accordance with the special census for purposes of distribution of funds, effective on the next July 1, following the certification of the census results by the federal bureau of the census or the department of economic and community development to the commissioner of finance and administration. The aggregate population shall likewise be adjusted in accordance with the special census, effective on the next July 1, following the certification of the census results by the federal bureau of the census or the department of economic and community development to the commissioner of finance and administration; provided, that any other special census of the entire municipality taken in the same manner provided in this section, under any other law, shall be used for the distribution of the funds, and in that case, no additional special census shall be taken under this section.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), a premiere tourist resort city, defined as a municipality having a population of one thousand one hundred (1,100) or more persons, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in which at least forty percent (40%) of the assessed valuation, as shown by the tax assessment rolls or books of the municipality, of the real estate in the municipality consists of hotels, motels, tourist court accommodations or tourist shops and restaurants, shall be considered a city with a population of ten thousand nine hundred forty-five (10,945) for purposes of distribution of funds under this section.

Acts 1953, ch. 1, § 3 (Williams, § 3407.22); Acts 1957, ch. 362, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; Acts 1974, ch. 514, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-408; Acts 1981, ch. 366, § 6; 1984, ch. 708, § 1; 1995, ch. 135, § 1; 2011, ch. 350, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “four (4) special censuses” for “three (3) special censuses” in the first sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 350, § 4. May 30, 2011.

Cross-References. Special census by counties, § 9-16-101.

54-4-204. State street aid fund — Funding mass transit.

Except as provided in subsection (f), each municipality shall keep all funds received from the municipal street aid fund in a separate fund designated as the state street aid fund” and may expend the funds only for one (1) or more of the following purposes:

Street improvements;

Principal of and interest on bonds or other indebtedness incurred to pay for street improvements issued after February 19, 1953. The funds may be specifically pledged as security for the bonds or other indebtedness;

The municipality's part of the cost of acquiring rights-of-way for approaches to bridges and tunnels;

To pay the city's part of the cost of grade eliminations on streets and highways, including state and federal highways; and

Not to exceed one third (1/3) of the total costs of rights-of-way for state or federal highways within the municipality's corporate boundaries.

A municipality, in its discretion, may use the funds to pay for street improvement work by the department of transportation or by a county highway or road department or by another municipality, performed under an agreement with the state, county or municipality.

Each municipality shall keep records of receipts into and expenditures from its state street aid fund, in accordance with sound municipal accounting practices, and shall have made an audit at the end of each fiscal year of the accounts of the fund by a certified public accountant, or a public accountant unless otherwise provided by law, and shall submit one (1) certified copy of the audit to the comptroller of the treasury to be reviewed for compliance with this part and minimum standards for municipal audits prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

All purchases made with state street aid funds by a municipality shall be made in conformity with public advertisement and competitive bidding laws applicable to the particular municipality.

Nothing in subdivision (d)(1) shall be interpreted as requiring any municipality to employ a licensed engineer to prepare bid specifications and estimates.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, funds in the municipal street aid fund may be expended by municipalities receiving the funds for the purpose of funding mass transit systems. No more than twenty-two and twenty-two one hundredths percent (22.22%) of the funds may be used for the purpose of funding mass transit.

Upon written request of a municipality, the comptroller of the treasury may authorize that funds received from the municipal street aid fund may be kept and accounted for in the general fund of the municipality; provided, that revenues and expenditures related to funds received from the municipal street aid fund shall be accounted for separately in the general fund in a manner that allows identification of the source of revenue and the expenditures related to the revenue.

Acts 1953, ch. 1, § 4 (Williams, § 3407.23); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1965, ch. 212, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-409; Acts 1980, ch. 881, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; Acts 1981, ch. 366, § 6; 1985, ch. 173, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 31, § 1; 1996, ch. 611, § 1.

54-4-205. Unlawful expenditures a misdemeanor — Liability.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any municipal official or employee to authorize, direct or permit the expenditure of the funds for any purpose, except those authorized by this part. Any municipal official or employee who violates this section shall be personally liable for any unauthorized expenditure of the funds.

Acts 1953, ch. 1, § 5 (Williams, § 3407.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-410; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.